Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6606
Home health agencies; employ qualified aides.

After January 1, 1989, home health agencies shall employ only home health aides qualified to provide home health care pursuant to sections 71-6601 to 71-6615. The department shall prescribe procedures for verification by home health agencies of successful completion of the requirements of section 71-6603. Home health agencies shall provide direction and supervision of home health aides. Home health agencies shall provide or make available to their home health aides four one-hour inservice programs per year on subjects relevant to home health care and shall verify such programs in a manner and method prescribed by the department.

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 121;

Laws 1991, LB 703, § 57.